Hawaii, session 2025, SB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 206M-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The development corporation may provide grants to any business in Hawaii that: (1)  Receives a federal small business innovation research phase I or II award or contract from any participating federal agency, up to fifty per cent of the amount of the federal award or contract; (2)  Receives a federal small business technology transfer program award or contract from any participating federal agency, up to fifty per cent of the amount of  the federal award or contract; (3)  Receives a federal small business innovation research phase III or small business technology transfer program phase III award or contract, up to fifty per cent of the amount of the award or contract funded by private sector of government sources outside of the program; or (4)  Applies for a small business innovation research federal grant or a small business technology transfer program federal grant, in an amount not to exceed [$3,000,] $6,000, subject to the availability of funds." SECTION 2.  Section 206M-15.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established the manufacturing development program, through which the development corporation may provide grants to any business in Hawaii that is a manufacturer in the State and requires assistance for any of the following items: (1)  Purchasing of manufacturing equipment; (2)  Training of employees on the use of new or existing manufacturing equipment; (3)  Improving existing energy efficiency manufacturing equipment or the purchase of improved energy efficiency equipment in the manufacturing process; [or] (4)  Purchasing of renewable energy technology systems, as defined in section 235-12.5, including photovoltaic, for the purpose of reducing manufacturing energy costs; provided that any renewable energy technology system purchased by a business that receives a grant pursuant to this paragraph shall not be eligible for the tax credit under section 235-12.5 to install or place that system in service; or [(4)] (5) Studying or planning the implementation of a new manufacturing facility; provided that no grant shall exceed twenty per cent of the cost of any of the above items, and no company shall receive a grant exceeding $100,000 in any given year." SECTION 3. Section 23512.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is  amended by amending subsection (i) to read as follows: "(i)  No taxpayer shall be allowed a credit under this section for [the]: (1)  The portion of the renewable energy technology system required by section 196-6.5 that is installed and placed in service on any newly constructed single‑family residential property authorized by a building permit issued on or after January 1, 2010[.]; or (2)  The installation or placing in service of any portion of a renewable energy technology system purchased in whole or in part with a grant received under the manufacturing development program pursuant to section 206M-15.1." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST